Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 29. Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

§ 33.2-2900.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Authority”
means the Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority created by §

33.2-2901

or, if the Authority is abolished, the board, body, commission, or agency succeeding to the principal functions thereof or on whom the powers given by this chapter to the Authority are conferred by law, but shall not include the City of Richmond or the Counties of Chesterfield and Henrico.

“Authority facility”
means all facilities purchased, constructed, or otherwise acquired by the Authority pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and all extensions and improvements thereof.

“Bonds”
or

“revenue bonds”

means revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds of the Authority issued under the provisions of this chapter.

“Cost,”
as applied to any project, includes the cost of construction, landscaping, and conservation; the cost of acquisition of all land, rights-of-way, property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by the Authority for such construction, landscaping, and conservation; the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which such buildings or structures may be moved; the cost of all machinery and equipment; the cost of financing charges and interest prior to and during construction and for a period of time after completion of construction as deemed advisable by the Authority; the cost of traffic estimates and of engineering and legal services, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing the project; the cost of administrative expenses; and the cost of payments to the Department or others for services during the period of construction, initial working capital, debt service reserves, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the construction of the project, the financing of such construction, and the placing of the project in operation. Any obligation or expense incurred by the Commonwealth Transportation Board or by the City of Richmond or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield, before or after the effective date of this chapter, for surveys, engineering, borings, plans and specifications, legal and other professional and technical services, reports, studies, and data in connection with the construction of a project shall be repaid or reimbursed by the Authority and the amounts thereof shall be included as a part of the cost of the project.

“Limited access highway”
means a highway specially designed for through traffic over or to which owners or occupants of abutting property or other persons have no easement of or right to light, air, view, or access by reason of the fact that their property abuts upon such highway, and access to which highway is controlled by the Authority, the Commonwealth, the City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, or the County of Chesterfield so as to give preference to through traffic by providing access connections with selected public highways only and by prohibiting crossings at grade or direct private driveway connections.

“Owner”
includes all individuals, partnerships, associations, organizations, and corporations, the City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, the County of Chesterfield, and all public agencies and instrumentalities having any title to or interest in any property, rights, easements, and interests authorized to be acquired by this chapter.

“Project”
means any single facility constituting an Authority facility, as described in the resolution or trust agreement providing for its construction, including extensions and improvements thereof.

“Public highways”
shall include public highways, roads, and streets, whether maintained by the Commonwealth or the City of Richmond or the County of Henrico or Chesterfield.

“Revenues”
means all fees, tolls, rents, rates, receipts, moneys, and income derived by the Authority through the ownership and operation of Authority facilities, and includes all cash contributions made to the Authority by the Commonwealth or any agency or department thereof, the City of Richmond, and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield not specifically dedicated by the contributor for a capital improvement.

History.

2009, c. 471, §

15.2-7000

; 2014, cc. 469, 805.

Cross references.

As to Transportation Trust Fund, see §

33.2-1524

. As to cessation of tolls, see §

33.2-1721

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 471, cl. 2 provides: “That the membership of the Board of Directors of the Richmond Metropolitan Authority shall continue after the effective date of this act for such period as such members may have remaining in their respective terms of office and the provisions of this act shall likewise not be interpreted to change or modify any bonds issued under the predecessor act or in any way impact bondholders thereof or decisions, rules, and regulations made by the Board of Directors prior to the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2014, c. 469, effective October 1, 2014, amended former §

15.2-7000

, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2014 amendment by c. 469 has been given effect in this section by substituting “Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority” for “Richmond Metropolitan Authority” in the Chapter 29 heading and in the definition for “Authority.”

§ 33.2-2901.
Creation of the Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

There is hereby created a political subdivision and public body corporate and politic of the Commonwealth to be known as the Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority, to be governed by a board of directors consisting of 16 members appointed as follows: five members to be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Chesterfield County for terms of four years from the date of appointment; five members to be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Henrico County for terms of four years from the date of appointment; four members to be appointed by the Mayor of the City of Richmond with the approval of the City Council of the City of Richmond (Council) for terms of four years from the date of appointment; one member of the Council appointed by the president of the Council for a term of four years from the date of appointment; and one ex officio member from the Commonwealth Transportation Board to be appointed by the Commissioner of Highways. Any of the three localities may, in its discretion, appoint as one of its Board members an elected officeholder who is a member of the governing body of that locality. Vacancies in the membership of the board of directors shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for the unexpired portion of the term. The board of directors so appointed shall enter upon the performance of its duties and shall initially and annually elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from its membership and shall also elect annually a secretary or secretary-treasurer, who need not be a member of the board of directors. The chairman, or in his absence the vice-chairman, shall preside at all meetings of the board of directors, and in the absence of both the chairman and vice-chairman, the board of directors shall elect a chairman pro tempore who shall preside at such meetings. Nine directors shall constitute a quorum, and all action by the board of directors shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present and voting. The members of the board of directors shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred in attendance upon meetings of the board of directors or while otherwise engaged in the discharge of their duties, and each member shall also be paid the sum of $50 per day for each day or portion thereof during which he is engaged in the performance of his duties. Such expenses and compensation shall be paid out of the treasury of the Authority in such manner as shall be prescribed by the Authority. No member of the Board shall receive health insurance, dental insurance, retirement benefits, or other such benefits as compensation for his service on the Board.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7001; 2014, cc. 469, 805; 2020, cc. 281, 371.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 469, effective October 1, 2014, amended former § 15.2-7001, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2014 amendment by c. 469, has been given effect in this section as set out above.
In the section catchline and the first sentence, substituted “Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority” for “Richmond Metropolitan Authority,” substituted “16” for “11,” “five members” for “one member to be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Chesterfield County for a period of two years from the date of appointment; one member” and “one member to be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Henrico County for a period of two years from the date of appointment; one member” and “three members to be appointed by the Mayor of the City of Richmond with the approval of the City Council for terms of two years from the date of appointment; three members,” and substituted “terms of four years” for “a term of four years” three times; substituted the second sentence for “and thereafter the appointive members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of four years and until their successors have been appointed and are qualified”; in the sixth sentence substituted “Nine” for “Six” at the beginning; and added the last sentence.

Acts 2014, c. 469, cl. 2 provides: “That the terms of the additional members of the Board of Directors of the Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority (the Board) to be appointed by Chesterfield County and Henrico County as provided in this act shall commence on July 1, 2014. In order to implement the reduction in the number of members of the Board appointed by the City of Richmond, the terms of all current members of the Board appointed by the City of Richmond shall expire on July 1, 2014, and the Mayor of the City of Richmond shall appoint with the approval of the City Council five new members, which number may include members of the Board whose terms expire on July 1, 2014.”

Acts 2020, cc. 281 and 371, cl. 2 provides: “That the first vacancy on the Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority (Authority) occurring on or after July 1, 2020, due to the resignation or expiration of the term of a member of the Authority appointed by the Mayor of Richmond shall be filled by a member of the City Council of the City of Richmond appointed pursuant to this act.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 281 and 371 are identical, and in the first sentence, substituted “four members” for “five members,” inserted “(Council)” following “City of Richmond,” and inserted “one member of the Council appointed by the president of the Council for a term of four years from the date of appointment.”

§ 33.2-2902.
Powers of the Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

In order to alleviate highway congestion; promote highway safety; expand highway construction; increase the utility and benefits and extend the services of public highways, including bridges, tunnels, and other highway facilities, both free and toll; and otherwise contribute to the economy, industrial and agricultural development, and welfare of the Commonwealth and the City of Richmond and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, the Authority shall have the following powers:

To contract and be contracted with, to sue and be sued, and to adopt, use, and alter at its pleasure a seal;

To acquire and hold real or personal property necessary or convenient for its purposes;

To sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any personal or real property or rights, easements, or estates therein deemed by the Authority not necessary for its purposes;

With the approval of the Mayor and the Council of the City of Richmond and the Boards of Supervisors of the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, to purchase, construct, or otherwise acquire ownership of or rights to manage limited access highways within the corporate limits of the City of Richmond and the Counties of Chesterfield and Henrico, including all bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, grade separations, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, tollhouses, administration buildings, storage buildings, and other buildings and facilities, and rights or licenses to operate existing toll roads that the Authority may deem necessary or convenient for the operation of such limited access highways. Title to any property acquired by the Authority shall be taken in the name of the Authority. Without the need of approval from such local governing bodies, the Authority may maintain, repair, and operate, or cause to be repaired, maintained, and operated, such limited access highways and related facilities;

With the approval of the Mayor and the City Council of the City of Richmond and the Boards of Supervisors of the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, to own, operate, maintain, and provide rapid and other transit facilities and services for the transportation of the public; to enter into contracts with the City and the County or Counties and any public service corporations doing business as common carriers of passengers and property for the use of Authority facilities for such purpose; to enter into contracts for the transportation of passengers and property over facilities of localities other than those controlled by the Authority, as well as the property and facilities of the Authority; and to construct, acquire, operate, and maintain any other properties and facilities, including such offices and commercial facilities in connection therewith as are deemed necessary or convenient by the Authority, for the relief of traffic congestion, to provide vehicular parking, to promote transportation of persons and property, or to promote the flow of commerce that the City Council of the City of Richmond and the Boards of Supervisors of the Counties of Chesterfield and Henrico may request the Authority to provide;

With the approval of the Mayor and the City Council of the City of Richmond and the Boards of Supervisors of the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, to acquire land; to construct, own, and operate sports facilities of any nature, including facilities reasonably related thereto; to construct, own, and operate coliseums and arenas, including facilities reasonably related thereto; to own a baseball stadium of sufficient seating capacity and quality for the playing of baseball at the level immediately below Major League Baseball; and to lease such land, stadium, sports facilities, coliseums, arenas, and attendant facilities under such terms and conditions as the Authority may prescribe. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this subdivision and any bond indenture to which the Authority is subject, the provisions of the bond indenture shall be controlling;

To acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any lands, property rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other property, including public lands, parks, playgrounds, reservations, highways, or parkways, or parts thereof or rights therein, of any person, partnership, association, railroad, public service, public utility, or other corporation, or of any municipality, county, or other political subdivision, deemed necessary or convenient for the construction or the efficient operation of a project or necessary in the restoration, replacement, or relocation of public or private property damaged or destroyed whenever a reasonable price cannot be agreed upon with the governing body of such municipality, county, or other political subdivision as to such property owned by it or whenever the Authority cannot agree on the terms of purchase or settlement with the other owners because of the incapacity of such owners, because of the inability to agree on the compensation to be paid or other terms of settlement or purchase, or because such owners are nonresidents of the Commonwealth, are unknown, or are unable to convey valid title to such property. Such proceedings shall be in accordance with and subject to the provisions of any and all laws of the Commonwealth applicable to the exercise of the power of eminent domain in the name of the Commissioner of Highways and subject to the provisions of §

25.1-102

as fully as if the Authority were a corporation possessing the power of eminent domain. Title to any property condemned by the Authority shall immediately vest in the Authority, and the Authority shall be entitled to the immediate possession of such property upon the deposit with the clerk of the court in which such condemnation proceedings are originated of the total amount of the appraised price of the property and court costs and fees as provided by law, notwithstanding that any of the parties to such proceedings shall appeal from any decision in such condemnation proceeding. Whenever the Authority makes such deposit in connection with any condemnation proceeding, the making of such deposit shall not preclude the Authority from appealing any decision rendered in such proceedings. Upon the deposit with the clerk of the court of the appraised price, any person entitled thereto may, upon petition to the court, be paid his or their pro rata share of 90 percent of such appraised price. The acceptance of such payment shall not preclude such person from appealing any decision rendered in such proceedings. If the appraisement is greater or less than the amount finally determined by the decision in such proceeding or by an appeal, the amount of the increase or decrease shall be paid by or refunded to the Authority.The terms “appraised price” and “appraisement” as used in this subdivision mean the value determined by two competent real estate appraisers appointed by the Authority for such purposes.The acquisition of any such property by condemnation or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain shall be and is hereby declared to be a public use of such property;

To determine the location of any limited access highways constructed or acquired by the Authority, subject to the approval of the Commonwealth Transportation Board, and to determine the design standards and materials of construction of such highways;

To designate, with the approval of the Commonwealth Transportation Board, the location in the City of Richmond and in the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield and establish, limit, and control points of ingress to and egress from any limited access highway constructed by the Authority within the corporate limits of the City of Richmond and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield as may be necessary or desirable in the judgment of the Authority to insure the proper operation and maintenance of such highway; to prohibit entrance to and exit from such highway from any point not so designated; and to construct, maintain, repair, and operate service roads connecting with points of ingress to and egress from such highway at such locations in the City of Richmond and in the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield as may be designated by the Authority;

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter, including contracts or agreements authorized by this chapter with the Commonwealth Transportation Board, the City of Richmond, and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield;

To construct grade separations at intersections of any limited access highway constructed by the Authority with public highways or other public ways or places and to change and adjust the lines and grades thereof so as to accommodate the same to the design of the grade separation. The cost of such grade separations and any damage incurred in changing and adjusting the lines and grades of such highways, ways, and places shall be ascertained and paid by the Authority as a part of the cost of such highway;

To vacate or change the location of any portion of any public highway or other public way or place, public utility, sewer, pipe, main, conduit, cable, wire, tower, pole, and other equipment and appliance of the Commonwealth, of the City of Richmond, or of the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, and to reconstruct the same in such new location as shall be designated by the Authority and of substantially the same type and in as good condition as the original highway, street, way, place, public utility, sewer, pipe, main, conduit, cable, wire, tower, pole, equipment, or appliance, with the cost of such reconstruction and any damage incurred in vacating or changing the location thereof ascertained and paid by the Authority as a part of the cost of the project in connection with such expenditures. Any public highway or other public way or place vacated or relocated by the Authority shall be vacated or relocated in the manner provided by law for the vacation or relocation of public highways, and any damages awarded on account thereof shall be paid by the Authority as a part of the cost of the project;

To enter upon any lands, waters, and premises for the purpose of making such surveys, soundings, borings, and examinations as the Authority may deem necessary or convenient for its purposes. Such entry shall not be deemed a trespass, nor shall an entry for such purposes be deemed an entry under any condemnation proceeding; however, the Authority shall pay any actual damage resulting to such lands, water, and premises as a result of such entry and activities;

To operate or permit the operation of vehicles for the transportation of persons or property for compensation on any limited access highway constructed or acquired by the Authority, provided that the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration shall not be divested of jurisdiction to authorize or regulate the operation of such carriers;

To establish reasonable regulations for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, relocation, and removal of pipes, mains, sewers, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances (public utility facilities) of the City of Richmond and the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield and of public utility and public service corporations and of any person, firm, or other corporation rendering similar services, owning or operating public utility facilities in, on, along, over, or under highways constructed by the Authority. Whenever the Authority shall determine that it is necessary that any public utility facilities should be relocated or removed, the Authority may relocate or remove the public utility facilities in accordance with the regulations of the Authority, and the cost and expense of such relocation or removal, including the cost of installing the public utility facilities in a new location and the cost of any lands or any rights or interests in lands and any other rights acquired to accomplish such relocation or removal, shall be paid by the Authority as a part of the cost of such highway. The owner or operator of the public utility facilities may maintain and operate the public utility facilities with the necessary appurtenances in the new location for as long a period and upon the same terms and conditions as it had the right to maintain and operate the public utility facilities in the former location;

With the approval of the Mayor and the Council of the City of Richmond and the Boards of Supervisors of the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, to borrow money and issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for any of its corporate purposes, such bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness to be payable solely from the revenues or other unencumbered funds available to the Authority that are pledged to the payment of such bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness;

To fix, charge, and collect fees, tolls, rents, rates, and other charges for the use of Authority facilities and the parts or sections thereof;

To establish rules and regulations for the use of any Authority facilities as may be necessary or expedient in the interest of public safety with respect to the use of Authority facilities and property under the control of the Authority;

To employ consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, trustees, depositaries, paying agents, and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in the discretion of the Authority to construct, acquire, maintain, and operate Authority facilities and to fix their compensation;

To receive and accept from any federal agency for or in aid of the construction of any Authority facility or for or in aid of any Authority undertaking authorized by this chapter, and to receive and accept from the Commonwealth, the City of Richmond, or the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield and from any other source, grants, contributions, or other aid in such construction or undertaking, or for operation and maintenance, either in money, property, labor, materials, or other things of value; and

To do all other acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in this chapter.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7002; 2014, cc. 469, 805; 2016, c. 605.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 469, effective October 1, 2014, amended former § 15.2-7002, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2014 amendment by c. 469 has been given effect in this section as set out above.
In the section catchline, substituted “Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority” for “Richmond Metropolitan Authority”; in subdivision 4, substituted “With the approval of the Mayor and the City Council of the City of Richmond and the Boards of Supervisors of the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield, to purchase, construct, or otherwise acquire, ownership of or rights to manage” for “To purchase, construct, or otherwise acquire, maintain, repair, and operate, or cause to be repaired, maintained, and operated”
and “and, administration buildings, storage buildings, and other buildings and facilities, and rights or licenses to operate existing toll roads” for “and, administration, storage, and other buildings and facilities” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; in subdivisions 5 and 6, inserted “the Mayor and” near the beginning; and in subdivision 16, inserted “With the approval of the Mayor and the Council of the City of Richmond and the Boards of Supervisors of the Counties of Henrico and Chesterfield” at the beginning.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 605, in subdivision 6, inserted “to construct, own, and operate coliseums and arenas, including facilities reasonable related thereto,” and “coliseums, arenas.”

§ 33.2-2903.
Issuance of revenue bonds.

The Authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue bonds of the Authority for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of Authority facilities or any project or portion of such facilities. The principal of and interest on such bonds shall be payable solely from the revenues pledged for such payment. The bonds of each issue or series shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding six percent per year, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 50 years from the date or dates thereof, as may be determined by the Authority, and may contain provisions reserving the right of the Authority to redeem such bonds before maturity at such price or prices and upon such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Authority in the resolution authorizing such bonds. Such bonds may be issued in coupon form, registered form, or both as prescribed by the Authority, and provisions may be made for the registration of coupon bonds as to principal only or as to both principal and interest and for the reconversion of registered bonds into coupon bonds. Such bonds may be issued in any denomination and may be made payable at any bank or trust company within or without the Commonwealth as the Authority may determine. Such bonds and the coupons attached to coupon bonds shall be signed in such manner either manually or by facsimile signature, as shall be determined by the Authority, and sealed with the seal of the Authority or a facsimile thereof. In case any officer whose signature or facsimile thereof shall appear on any bond or coupon shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or such facsimile signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officer or officers had remained in office until the delivery thereof. The Authority may sell such bonds in such manner either at public or private sale and for such price or prices as the Authority may determine, but no such sale shall be made at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than six percent per year, computed with relation to the absolute maturity of the bonds in accordance with standard tables of bond values, excluding from such computation the amount of any premium to be paid on the redemption of any bond prior to maturity. Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The Authority may also provide for the replacement of any bond that has become mutilated, destroyed, or lost.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7003; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2904.
Rates and charges.

Whenever the Authority has constructed or otherwise acquired Authority facilities and has issued bonds for such purpose, the Authority shall fix, revise, charge, and collect fees, tolls, rents, rates, and other charges for the use of such facilities and the different parts or sections thereof, sufficient, together with any other moneys made available and used for that purpose, to pay the principal of and interest on such bonds, together with reserves for such purposes, and to maintain and operate such facilities and to keep the same in good condition and repair. Such fees, tolls, rents, rates, and other charges shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any commission, board, bureau, or agency of the Commonwealth or of any municipality, county, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, and all revenues, when collected, and the proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds, shall be held by the Authority in trust for the benefit of the holders of bonds of the Authority issued for the construction or acquisition of Authority facilities and for properly maintaining, operating, and repairing the Authority facilities.

Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the Commonwealth, the City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, or the County of Chesterfield or a pledge of the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth, the City of Richmond, the County of Henrico, or the County of Chesterfield and shall be payable solely from the funds provided therefor from revenues.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7004; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2905.
Use of state highway maintenance and construction funds for Authority facilities.

Until all bonds of the Authority, including refunding bonds, and the interest thereon are paid in full, the Commonwealth Transportation Board may use any part of funds available for the maintenance of state highways in the highway construction district in which the Authority’s facilities are wholly or partly located to provide for such portion of the operation, maintenance, and repair of the facilities of the Authority as is deemed in the public interest; however, no part of such funds shall be used for the facilities of the Authority unless the fees, tolls, rents, rates, and other charges for the use thereof are not sufficient to make the required payments of principal and interest on the outstanding revenue bonds issued in connection therewith, and to operate, maintain, and repair the same.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7005; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2906.
Refunding bonds.

The Authority is hereby authorized by resolution to provide for the issuance of refunding revenue bonds with which to refund outstanding revenue bonds or any issue or series of such outstanding bonds, which refunding revenue bonds may be issued at or before the maturity or redemption date of the bonds to be refunded, and to include different issues or series of such outstanding revenue bonds by a single issue of refunding revenue bonds, and to issue refunding revenue bonds to pay any redemption premium and interest to accrue and become payable on the outstanding revenue bonds being refunded to the date of payment or redemption, and to establish reserves for such refunding revenue bonds. Such refunding revenue bonds shall be payable solely from all or that portion of the revenues of the Authority facilities pledged to the payment thereof in the bond resolution pursuant to which such bonds were issued. Such refunding revenue bonds may, in the discretion of the Authority, be exchanged at par for the revenue bonds that are being refunded or may be sold at public or private sale in such manner and at such price as the Authority shall deem for the best interests of the Authority, but no such sale shall be made at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than six percent per year, computed with relation to the absolute maturity of the bonds in accordance with standard tables of bond values, excluding from such computation the amount of any premium to be paid on the redemption of any bonds prior to maturity, and may be issued and delivered at any time prior to the date of redemption or maturity date of the bonds to be refunded as the Authority determines to be in the best interests of the Authority. The interest rate or rates on refunding revenue bonds shall not be limited by the interest rate or rates borne by any of the revenue bonds to be refunded thereby. The proceeds derived from the sale of refunding revenue bonds issued under this chapter shall be invested in obligations of or guaranteed by the United States government pending the application of such proceeds to the purpose for which such refunding revenue bonds have been issued. To further secure such refunding revenue bonds, the Authority may contract with the purchasers thereof with respect to the safekeeping and application of the proceeds thereof and the safekeeping and application of the earnings of such investments. The determination of the Authority with respect to the financial soundness and advantage of the issuance and delivery of refunding revenue bonds authorized under this chapter shall be conclusive, but nothing contained in this section shall require the holders of any outstanding revenue bonds being refunded to accept payment thereof otherwise than as provided in the outstanding bonds.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7006; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-2907.
Trust agreement.

In the discretion of the Authority, any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement or indenture by and between the Authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth, to be selected by the Authority in such manner as it may elect. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign all or any portion of the tolls and other revenues to be received by the Authority from the ownership and operation of Authority facilities, but shall not convey or mortgage any Authority facilities or any part thereof. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth that may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Authority. Any such resolution, trust agreement, or indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any such resolution, trust agreement, or indenture may contain such other provisions as the Authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the Authority facilities or portion thereof.

All or any portion of the revenues derived from the ownership and operation of Authority facilities, as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement or indenture securing such bonds, may be pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the payment shall become due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the Authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the Authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement nor indenture by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the Authority.

History.

2009, c. 471, § 15.2-7007; 2014, c. 805.